New York, session 2025-2026, S2292.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "whale 2 awareness act". 3 § 2. Article 13 of the environmental conservation law is amended by 4 adding a new title 9 to read as follows: 5 TITLE 9 6 WHALE AWARENESS ACT 7 Section 13-0901. Marine mammal interaction recommendations and educa- 8 tional materials. 9 § 13-0901. Marine mammal interaction recommendations and educational 10 materials. 11 1. The department shall establish recommendations and educational 12 materials for the reduction of marine mammal interactions with vessels. 13 In developing such recommendations and educational materials, the 14 department shall consult with the port authority of New York and New 15 Jersey, the office of parks, recreation and historic preservation, the 16 United States coast guard, the national oceanic and atmospheric adminis- 17 tration, the marine mammal commission, and any other relevant agencies. 18 For purposes of this section, "marine mammal interaction" means any act EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04652-07-6 S. 2292--B 2 1 of pursuit, torment, or annoyance of a marine mammal in the wild that 2 has the potential to injure or disturb such mammal by causing disruption 3 of behavioral patterns, including, but not limited to, migration, 4 breathing, nursing, breeding, feeding, or sheltering. 5 2. Recommendations and educational materials developed pursuant to 6 this section shall be posted publicly on the department's website and 7 provided to owners and operators of a party boat or charter boat pursu- 8 ant to section 13-0336 of this article, persons participating in a boat- 9 ing safety course required pursuant to section forty-nine of the naviga- 10 tion law, and on or after December thirty-first, two thousand 11 twenty-eight, to registrants of vessels registered in the state in 12 accordance with section twenty-two hundred fifty-one of the vehicle and 13 traffic law. 14 § 3. Section 75 of the navigation law, as amended by chapter 361 of 15 the laws of 2013, is amended to read as follows: 16 § 75. Educational program. In order to protect the public interest in 17 the prudent and equitable use of the waters of the state and enhance the 18 enjoyment of pleasure boating and other sports thereon, the commissioner 19 shall initiate and put into effect a comprehensive educational program 20 designed to advance boating safety, which provides for the training of 21 all boat operators in the safe operation of vessels including personal 22 watercraft and specialty prop-craft. Such educational program shall 23 include recommendations and educational materials for the reduction of 24 marine mammal interactions with vessels developed pursuant section 25 13-0901 of the environmental conservation law. 26 § 4. Section 2251 of the vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding 27 a new subdivision 10 to read as follows: 28 10. Marine mammal interaction prevention. In issuing a registration 29 pursuant to this section with respect to any registration application 30 where the address therein is in the county of Suffolk, Nassau, Kings, 31 Queens, New York, Richmond, Bronx, Westchester, or Rockland, the commis- 32 sioner shall also provide marine mammal interaction prevention recommen- 33 dations and educational materials developed pursuant to section 13-0901 34 of the environmental conservation law. 35 § 5. Severability. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, 36 section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent 37 jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or 38 invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation 39 to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part thereof 40 directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have 41 been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legislature 42 that this act would have been enacted even if such invalid provisions 43 had not been included herein. 44 § 6. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 45 it shall have become a law; provided, however, section four of this act 46 shall take effect December 31, 2028.